cs: Vhodnost typu dna: Jíl; Tráva/plevel; Štěrk; Smíšené; Bláto; Skály; Písek; Jiné
hr-HR: Prikladnost tipa dna: Glina; Trava/alge; Šljunak; Miješano; Blato; Kamen; Pijesak; Ostalo
lt-LT: Dugno tipo tinkamumas: Molis; Žolės / dumbliai; Žvyras; Mišrus; Dumblas; Uoliena; Smėlis; Kitas
fr: Compatibilité selon le type de fond: Argile; Herbe/végétation; Gravier; Mixte; Boue; Roche; Sable; Autre
el: Καταλληλότητα τύπου κάτω μέρους: Πηλός; Γρασίδι/Αγριόχορτα; Χαλίκι; Μεικτό; Λάσπη; Πέτρα; Άμμος; Άλλο
it: Idoneità del tipo di fondo: Argilla; Erba/Alghe; Ghiaia; Misto; Fango; Roccia; Sabbia; Altro
pl: Przystosowanie do rodzaju dna: Glina; Trawa / wodorosty; Żwir; Mieszane; Muł; Skały; Piasek; Inne
fi: Pohjatyypin soveltuvuus: Savi; Ruoho/vesikasvit; Sora; Sekalainen; Muta; Kallio; Hiekka; Muu
pt-BR: Adequação do tipo de fundo: Argila; Grama/ervas daninhas; Cascalho; Misto; Lama; Pedra; Areia; Outros
sl-SI: Primernost vrste dna: Glina; Trava/plevel; Gramoz; Mešano; Blato; Skala; Pesek; Drugo
th: ความเหมาะสมกับสภาพพื้นทะเล: ดินเหนียว; หญ้า/วัชพืช; กรวด; ผสม; โคลน; หิน; ทราย; อื่นๆ
nb: Egnethet for bunntype: Leire; Gress/ugress; Grus; Blandet; Gjørme; Stein; Sand; Annet
ja: ボトムタイプの適合性: 粘土; 草/水草; 砂利; 混合; 泥; 岩; 砂; その他
vi: Tính phù hợp của loại đáy: Đất sét; Cỏ/Rong rêu; Sỏi; Hỗn hợp; Bùn; Đá; Cát; Khác
sk-SK: Vhodnosť typu spodnej časti oblečenia: Íl; Tráva/burina; Štrk; Zmiešané; Blato; Kameň; Piesok; Iné
sv: Lämplighet för bottentyp: Lera; Gräs/sjögräs; Grus; Blandad; Gyttja; Sten; Sand; Annan
hu: Vízfenéktípushoz való alkalmasság: Agyagos; Füves/hínáros; Kavicsos; Vegyes; Iszapos; Sziklás; Homokos; Egyéb
nl: Bodem type geschiktheid: Klei; Gras/wier; Grind; Gemengd; Modder; Rots; Zand; Overige
de: Eignung für Bodentypen: Ton; Gras/Kräuter; Kies; Gemischt; Schlamm; Fels; Sand; Sonstige
da: Egnethed til bundtype: Ler; Græs/ukrudt; Grus; Blandet; Mudder; Sten; Sand; Andet
zh-TW: 海底類型適用性: 黏土; 草/水草; 礫石; 混合; 泥土; 岩石; 沙地; 其他
en: Bottom type suitability: Clay; Grass/Weeds; Gravel; Mixed; Mud; Rock; Sand; Other
es: Compatibilidad del tipo de fondo: Arcilla; Hierba/malezas; Grava; Mixto; Lodo; Roca; Arena; Otro
ro-RO: Adecvare pentru tipuri de fund de mare: Lut; Iarbă/Buruieni; Pietriș; Mixt; Nămol; Stâncă; Nisip; Altele
pt-PT: Adequação do tipo de fundo: Argila; Erva/algas; Cascalho; Misto; Lama; Rocha; Areia; Outro
tr: Taban türü uygunluğu: Kil; Çim/yosun; Çakıl; Karışık; Çamur; Kaya; Kum; Diğer
ru: Пригодность к типу дна: Глина; Трава/водоросли; Гравий; Смешанный; Ил; Камень; Песок; Другое
zh-CN: 底型适配度: 粘土; 草地/杂草; 碎石; 混合; 泥地; 岩石; 沙地; 其他
bg-BG: Съвместимост на долната част: Глина; Трева/водорасли; Чакъл; Смесено; Кал; Скали; Пясък; Друго
ko: 바닥 유형 적합성: 점토; 풀/수초; 자갈; 혼합; 진흙; 바위; 모래; 기타